dictionaries/ro-ro.aff
SFX S Y 14
SFX S ic icu ic
SFX S ic icule ic
SFX S ic icul ic                       adj.m.sg.neart.
SFX S ic icului ic                       adj.m.sg.dat.
SFX S ic ici ic                       adj.m.pl.neart.
SFX S ic icii ic                       adj.m.pl.art.
SFX S ic icilor ic                       adj.m.pl.dat.
SFX S ic icÄƒ ic                        adj.f.sg.neart.
SFX S ic ica ic                        adj.f.sg.art.
SFX S ic ico ic
SFX S ic icei ic                         adj.f.sg.dat.
SFX S ic ice ic                          adj.f.pl.neart.
SFX S ic icele ic                        adj.f.pl.dat.
SFX S ic icelor ic                       adj.f.pl.dat.
PFX S Y 1
PFX S 0 ne .


SFX Q Y 139
SFX Q   0     u      [^eu]
SFX Q   0     ul      [^eu]            adj. m. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     ului    [^eu]            adj. m. sg. dat.
SFX Q   0     i       [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   0     ii      [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^cdenstux]      adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     Äƒ       [^cegrsu]        adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     a       [^cgrsu]         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   0     ei      [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. sg. dat.
SFX Q   0     e       [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl.
SFX Q   0     ele     [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     elor    [^cgnrsu]        adj. f. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     i       [^s]c            adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   0     ii      [^s]c            adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^s]c            adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   0     Äƒ       [^s]c            adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   0     a       [^s]c            adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   sc    È™ti     sc               adj. m. pl.
SFX Q   sc    È™tii    sc               adj. m. pl. art.
SFX Q   sc    È™tilor  sc               adj. m. pl. dat.
SFX Q   sc    ascÄƒ    [^a]..sc         adj. f. sg.
SFX Q   sc    asca    [^a]..sc         adj. f. sg. art.
SFX Q   x     cÈ™i     x        # de verificat ordinea È™i la rÃ¢ndurile urmÄƒtoare
SFX Q   x     cÈ™ii    x
SFX Q   x     cÈ™ilor  x
SFX Q   0     Äƒ       a..sc
SFX Q   0     a       a..sc
SFX Q   e     i       e
SFX Q   e     ii      e
SFX Q   e     ilor    e
SFX Q   g     Äƒ       [^e]g
SFX Q   g     a       [^e]g
SFX Q   g     agÄƒ     eg
SFX Q   g     aga     eg
SFX Q   0     ile     g
SFX Q   0     i       [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ii      [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ilor    [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ei      [^a]n
SFX Q   0     e       [^a]n
SFX Q   0     ele     [^a]n
SFX Q   0     elor    [^a]n
SFX Q   an    eni     [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    enii    [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    enilor  [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    enei    [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    ene     [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    enele   [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    enelor  [^efl]an
SFX Q   an    ni      [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nii     [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nilor   [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nei     [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    ne      [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nele    [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    nelor   [^c]ean
SFX Q   an    eni     cean
SFX Q   an    enii    cean
SFX Q   an    enilor  cean
SFX Q   an    enei    cean
SFX Q   an    ene     cean
SFX Q   an    enele   cean
SFX Q   an    enelor  cean
SFX Q   0     i       [fl]an
SFX Q   0     ii      [fl]an
SFX Q   0     ilor    [fl]an
SFX Q   0     ei      [fl]an
SFX Q   0     e       [fl]an
SFX Q   0     ele     [fl]an
SFX Q   0     elor    [fl]an
SFX Q   0     Äƒ       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     a       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     ei      [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     e       [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     ele     [^o][rs]
SFX Q   0     elor    [^o][rs]
SFX Q   r     are     [^j]or      # ????? feminin singular!!!
SFX Q   r     area    tor
SFX Q   r     ara     [^jt]or
SFX Q   r     arÄƒ     [^jt]or
SFX Q   r     arei    [^j]or
SFX Q   r     are     [^j]or
SFX Q   r     arele   [^j]or
SFX Q   r     arelor  [^j]or
SFX Q   0     Äƒ       jor
SFX Q   r     ra      jor
SFX Q   r     rei     jor
SFX Q   r     re      jor
SFX Q   r     rele    jor
SFX Q   r     relor   jor
SFX Q   s     asÄƒ     [eo]s
SFX Q   s     asa     [eo]s
SFX Q   s     asei    os
SFX Q   s     ase     os
SFX Q   s     asele   os
SFX Q   s     aselor  os
SFX Q   0     l       u
SFX Q   0     lui     u
SFX Q   u     i       [^r]u
SFX Q   u     ii      iu
SFX Q   u     ii      [^ri]u
SFX Q   u     ilor    [^r]u
SFX Q   u     i       [^s].ru
SFX Q   u     ii      [^s].ru
SFX Q   u     ilor    [^s].ru
SFX Q   stru  È™tri    stru
SFX Q   stru  È™trii   stru
SFX Q   stru  È™trilor stru
SFX Q   u     Äƒ       [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     a       u
SFX Q   u     ei      [^e]u
SFX Q   u     e       [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     ele     [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     elor    [^ei]u
SFX Q   u     aua     eu
SFX Q   u     lei     eu
SFX Q   u     le      eu
SFX Q   u     lele    eu
SFX Q   u     lelor   eu
SFX Q   u     e       iu
SFX Q   u     i       iu
SFX Q   u     ile     iu
SFX Q   u     ilor    iu
SFX Q   d     zi      d
SFX Q   d     zii     d
SFX Q   d     zilor   d
SFX Q   s     È™i      s
SFX Q   s     È™ii     s
SFX Q   s     È™ilor   s
SFX Q   t     È›i      [^s]t
SFX Q   t     È›ii     [^s]t
SFX Q   t     È›ilor   [^s]t
SFX Q   st    È™ti     st
SFX Q   st    È™tii    st
SFX Q   st    È™tilor  st
SFX Q   0     ei      [aei]c
SFX Q   0     e       [aei]c
SFX Q   0     ele     [aei]c
SFX Q   0     elor    [aei]c
PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q 0 ne .
#end*******************************************************************************
