dictionaries/ro-ro.dic
abstinent/Q
acelular/Q
acetic/S
aclinic/S
acronic/S
activator/Q
acvatic/S
adipic/S
administrat/Q
aerobiotic/Q
aerobiotic/S
aerostatic/S
agabaritic/S
agestit/Q
agonic/S
agrometeorologic/S
agrozootehnic/S
albitor/Q
alcoolic/S
aleuritic/S
algologic/S
almicantarat/Q
alogenetic/S
altaic/S
ambreiat/Q
amfibrahic/S
ampelografic/S
amurgit/Q
anacronic/S
anafilactic/S
anagramatic/S
analitic/S
anarhic/S
anastomotic/S
anecdotic/S
aneroid/Q
anevrismatic/S
animalic/S
anorectic/S
antebelic/S
antiapoplectic/S
antiaristocratic/Q
antic/S
antidifteric/S
antifonic/S
antimalaric/S
antimarxist/Q
antinomic/S
antipoetic/S
antiseismic/S
antitabac/Q
antitehnic/S
antizimic/S
antropografic/S
aperiodic/S
aplicat/Q
apogamic/S
apraxic/S
aramean/Q
arctic/S
arhaic/S
arhontat/Q
artritic/S
arÄƒmiu/Q
asiatic/S
asociaÈ›ional/Q
astmatic/S
atehnic/S
atomoelectric/S
atras/Q
autodistrus/Q
autogenetic/S
avantajos/Q
axonometric/S
baladesc/Q
balneoclimateric/S
bazic/S
belciugat/Q
biblic/S
bifoliat/Q
bimetalic/S
biodinamic/S
biologic/S
biospeologic/S
birjÄƒresc/Q
blastodermic/S
bocitor/Q
botulinic/S
bracteat/Q
brumatic/S
bucelat/Q
burghezesc/Q
bÄƒhnit/Q
bÄƒÈ™icos/Q
cacofonic/S
calic/S
calos/Q
canibalic/S
capitos/Q
cardiotoxic/S
carosabil/Q
cataleptic/S
catodic/S
cauzalist/Q
cefaloscopic/S
cercat/Q
cetonic/S
chestionat/Q
chistic/S
cicloturistic/Q
cifric/S
circumferenÈ›iar/Q
cirilic/S
citologic/S
clasicist/Q
climatic/S
clÄƒit/Q
coeziv/Q
coleretic/S
comanditat/Q
complexificat/Q
conchiliologic/Q
congelabil/Q
consonantic/S
constrÃ¢ns/Q
contrastiv/Q
copiator/Q
coroietic/Q
cosmogonic/S
cremos/Q
cromozomic/S
cronolog/Q
cultivator/Q
cutezÄƒtor/Q
cÃ¢rÃ¢it/Q
cÄƒsÄƒpit/Q
debreiat/Q
decomandat/Q
deflaÈ›ionist/Q
deictic/S
delimitator/Q
dendrografic/S
dendrometrist/Q
depreciator/Q
descintrat/Q
desferecat/Q
destructurat/Q
devotat/Q
dezinflamat/Q
diabetogen/Q
diamagnetic/S
digerabil/Q
discusiv/Q
dislexic/S
divalent/Q
documentaristic/S
domiciliar/Q
draconic/S
dres/Q
durificat/Q
echilibristic/S
ecliptic/Q
econometric/S
ejaculat/Q
elastic/S
electrochimic/S
electronic/S
electrotermic/S
eloxat/Q
embriotomic/S
enclitic/S
endotermic/S
entuziasmant/Q
eolitic/S
epidictic/S
episodic/S
ergonomic/S
eruptiv/Q
escatologic/S
etimologic/S
etnomuzicologic/Q
eufemistic/S
eupeptic/S
exacerbat/Q
exortativ/Q
exostozic/S
externist/Q
extralingvistic/S
facÈ›ios/Q
fantasmagoric/S
fatidic/S
faÈ™ionabil/Q
feric/S
festivist/Q
filologic/S
finanÈ›at/Q
fitoterapic/S
flegmatic/S
flenduros/Q
foiletonistic/S
folosibil/Q
fonologic/S
fotochimic/S
fotomecanic/Q
fotomicrografic/S
francmasonic/S
frunzÄƒrit/Q
ftizic/S
furniruit/Q
galenic/S
galvanizat/Q
genic/S
genuncheat/Q
geomagnetic/S
germanic/S
gimnastic/Q
glagolitic/S
gonflat/Q
gongoric/S
gravimetric/S
grijuliv/Q
guvernatorat/Q
hagiologic/S
halucinat/Q
hectolitric/S
heliometric/S
hematuric/S
hemoragic/S
heterociclic/S
heterodox/Q
hidrodinamic/S
hidrometric/S
himeric/S
hioid/Q
hipiatric/S
hipodermic/S
histochimic/S
homeopatic/S
honipsit/Q
hÃ¢rcÄƒit/Q
iconic/S
identificabil/Q
idilic/S
iernatic/S
imaculat/Q
imagistic/S
implementat/Q
inalterabil/Q
inamic/S
increat/Q
industrios/Q
infraroÈ™u/Q
iniÈ›iatic/S
insinuator/Q
intempestiv/Q
interoceanic/S
interpersonal/Q
introspectat/Q
iodometric/S
ipat/Q
ischemic/S
isprÄƒvnicit/Q
italic/S
jamaican/Q
josnic/S
junghiat/Q
lactogenetic/S
lambrisat/Q
legumit/Q
leucoreic/S
licenÈ›iat/Q
limnimetric/S
lipit/Q
logistic/S
loÈ›ionat/Q
luciferic/S
lÄƒcrimÄƒtor/Q
macrobiotic/S
magmatic/Q
magnetohidrodinamic/S
malefic/S
manichiurat/Q
masiv/Q
matronimic/S
mediastinal/Q
mefitic/S
melodramatic/S
mentor/Q
mesianic/S
metalochimic/S
metapsihic/S
meteoritic/Q
meteorologic/S
mezoblastic/S
miasmatic/S
microelectronic/S
midriatic/S
mierlÄƒitor/Q
mintos/Q
miologic/S
mitotic/S
miÈ™cat/Q
moftologic/S
mojicos/Q
monobazic/S
monofiletic/S
monografist/Q
monolitic/S
morfematic/S
morocÄƒnos/Q
mucenic/S
mucos/Q
murdÄƒrit/Q
mÃ¢lcit/Q
mÄƒrginit/Q
narcisic/S
nautic/Q
neartistic/S
neasemÄƒnat/Q
necovÃ¢rÈ™it/Q
neeconomic/S
neelectrificat/Q
neidentificat/Q
nenumÄƒrat/Q
neocatolic/S
neologic/S
neperisabil/Q
nepolitic/S
neschimbÄƒtor/Q
neurologic/S
nevindecabil/Q
nevrednic/S
ninsoriu/Q
nivelmetric/S
normalizant/Q
nostalgic/S
nÄƒclÄƒit/Q
obconic/S
obiectivat/Q
ochitor/Q
ocitocic/S
odontologic/S
ogarnic/S
ogÄƒratic/Q
omeric/S
oncologic/S
ontogenic/S
operativ/Q
optometric/S
orhitic/S
orientabil/Q
ortodontic/S
ortoptic/S
ospÄƒtarnic/S
ostatic/Q
otorinolaringologic/S
oÈ›ios/Q
paleoantropologic/S
paleogeofizic/S
paleozoologic/S
pancromatic/S
panonic/Q
panteistic/S
parafinic/S
paralitic/S
parasintetic/S
parauniversal/Q
parodic/S
parÈ›ialnic/Q
patetic/S
pectic/S
pegmatit/Q
pentelic/S
perfectivizat/Q
perimetric/S
personificat/Q
petrografic/S
pieptos/Q
piretic/S
piscicultor/Q
pisolitic/S
planisferic/S
plastografiat/Q
pleonastic/S
plumbiu/Q
pneumatolitic/S
poetizat/Q
polarimetric/S
policiclic/S
polimetalic/S
polisintetic/S
polisportiv/Q
porcesc/Q
posologic/S
posttotalitarist/Q
preaplecat/Q
prebiotic/S
predomnitor/Q
preparandist/Q
presocratic/S
previzionat/Q
primenit/Q
procesional/Q
profetic/S
proiecÈ›ionist/Q
prosilogistic/S
prost/Q
protidic/S
prototipic/S
pruriginos/Q
psaltic/S
psihic/S
psihologic/S
psihotonic/S
pteridosperm/Q
purjat/Q
pÄƒcÄƒtos/Q
pÄƒduratic/S
radiobiologic/S
radioizotopic/S
radiotelegrafist/Q
radiotelemetric/S
readoptat/Q
reamuÈ™it/Q
reasmuÈ›it/Q
rebetonat/Q
rebutat/Q
recaterisit/Q
recivilizat/Q
reconcretizat/Q
recto-uterin/Q
redecapsulat/Q
redepÄƒnuÈ™at/Q
redeÈ™euat/Q
reduÈ™mÄƒnit/Q
reexasperat/Q
reflagelat/Q
refÄƒptuit/Q
regulamentar/Q
rehÃ¢zit/Q
reinovat/Q
rejeruit/Q
relopÄƒtat/Q
remeprizat/Q
remotroÈ™it/Q
renegociat/Q
reofertat/Q
reoscopic/S
reparlamentat/Q
replafonat/Q
repreamÄƒrit/Q
reprodus/Q
repÄƒgubit/Q
rereclasat/Q
rereorÃ¢nduit/Q
rerigidizat/Q
resabotat/Q
restrictiv/Q
retiranizat/Q
returnat/Q
revelatoriu/Q
revÄƒruit/Q
rezÄƒbrelit/Q
reÃ®mpÃ¢nzit/Q
reÃ®ncÄƒpÄƒstrat/Q
reÃ®nierbat/Q
reÃ®ntrunit/Q
reÈ™ocat/Q
robotic/S
robotizat/Q
rÃ¢njit/Q
rÄƒzboinic/S
rÄƒzorit/Q
sceptic/S
schematizant/Q
searbÄƒd/Q
semantic/S
semipermeabil/Q
sibilinic/Q
sinodic/S
slugarnic/Q
spectaculos/Q
spinotalamic/S
stelat/Q
strÄƒfulgerat/Q
sturlubatic/S
subsumat/Q
supraabundent/Q
sÄƒgetÄƒtor/Q
tahistoscopic/S
tanic/S
tehnopsihologic/S
tehnoredactor/Q
teleinformatic/S
tematologic/S
teozofic/S
termoelectric/S
tetanic/S
ticsit/Q
tiflografic/S
tonometric/S
toxic/S
transasiatic/S
transcontainerizat/Q
tribologic/S
trimotor/Q
tropic/S
tÃ¢rnosit/Q
ultrasonic/S
umoristic/Q
urologic/S
uzinat/Q
vecinic/S
viager/Q
vinilic/S
volatil/Q
voltaic/S
vÃ¢rstnic/S
vÄƒratic/Q
zavistnic/S
zgÃ¢rcit/Q
ziuatic/S
zÄƒdarnic/S
zÄƒtonit/Q
Ã®mpuscat/Q
Ã®ncrÃ¢ncinat/Q
Ã®nfomat/Q
Ã®nnisipat/Q
Ã®ntroienit/Q
Ã®nÈ›Äƒrcuit/Q
È™oltic/S
È™tempÄƒrit/Q
proromÃ¢n/Q
